Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.250

Agent—General authority—When created—When can be modified.

(1) Subject to the provisions of RCW 11.125.240, if a power of attorney grants to an agent authority to do all acts that a principal could do or contains words of similar effect, the agent has the general authority described in RCW 11.125.260 through 11.125.410.

(2) An agent has authority described in chapter 209, Laws of 2016 if the power of attorney refers to general authority with respect to the descriptive term for the subjects stated in RCW 11.125.270 through 11.125.410 or cites the section in which the authority is described.

(3) A reference in a power of attorney to general authority with respect to the descriptive term for a subject in RCW 11.125.270 through 11.125.410 or a citation to a section of RCW 11.125.270 through 11.125.410 incorporates the entire section as if it were set out in full in the power of attorney.

(4) A principal may modify authority incorporated by reference.

[ 2016 c 209 s 202.]